Illinois, session 104th, HB4631.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Section 65.15 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 947/65.15)7    Sec. 65.15. Special education teacher scholarships. 8    (a) There shall be awarded annually 250 scholarships to 9persons qualifying as members of any of the following groups:10        (1) Students who are otherwise qualified to receive a 11    scholarship as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this 12    Section and who make application to the Commission for 13    such scholarship and agree to take courses that will 14    prepare the student for the teaching of children described 15    in Section 14-1 of the School Code. 16        (2) Persons holding a valid certificate issued under 17    the laws relating to the certification of teachers and who 18    make application to the Commission for such scholarship 19    and agree to take courses that will prepare them for the 20    teaching of children described in Section 14-1 of the 21    School Code. 22        (3) Persons who (A) have graduated high school; (B) 23    have not been certified as a teacher; and (C) make   HB4631- 2 -LRB104 18387 LNS 31829 b1    application to the Commission for such scholarship and 2    agree to take courses that will prepare them for the 3    teaching of children described in Section 14-1 of the 4    School Code. 5    Subject to appropriation to the Commission for this 6purpose, up to 50 additional scholarships may be awarded each 7year to persons who qualify under this subsection (a). 8    Scholarships awarded under this Section shall be issued 9pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Commission; 10provided that no rule or regulation promulgated by the State 11Board of Education prior to the effective date of this 12amendatory Act of 1993 pursuant to the exercise of any right, 13power, duty, responsibility or matter of pending business 14transferred from the State Board of Education to the 15Commission under this Section shall be affected thereby, and 16all such rules and regulations shall become the rules and 17regulations of the Commission until modified or changed by the 18Commission in accordance with law. 19    For the purposes of this Section scholarships awarded each 20school year shall be deemed to be issued on July 1 of the year 21prior to the start of the postsecondary school term and all 22calculations for use of the scholarship shall be based on such 23date. Each scholarship shall entitle its holder to exemption 24from fees as provided in subsection (a) of Section 65.40 while 25enrolled in a special education program of teacher education, 26for a period of not more than 4 calendar years and shall be   HB4631- 3 -LRB104 18387 LNS 31829 b1available for use at any time during such period of study 2except as provided in subsection (b) of Section 65.40. 3    Scholarships issued to holders of a valid certificate 4issued under the laws relating to the certification of 5teachers as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection may 6also entitle the holder thereof to a program of teacher 7education that will prepare the student for the teaching of 8children described in Section 14-1 of the School Code at the 9graduate level. 10    (b) The principal, or his or her designee, of an approved 11high school shall certify to the Commission, for students who 12are Illinois residents and are completing an application, that 13the students ranked scholastically in the upper one-half of 14their graduating class at the end of the sixth semester. 15    (c) Each holder of a scholarship must furnish proof to the 16Commission, in such form and at such intervals as the 17Commission prescribes, of the holder's continued enrollment in 18a teacher education program qualifying the holder for the 19scholarship. Any holder of a scholarship who fails to register 20in a special education program of teacher education at the 21university within 10 days after the commencement of the term, 22quarter or semester immediately following the receipt of the 23scholarship or who, having registered, withdraws from the 24university or transfers out of teacher education, shall 25thereupon forfeit the right to use it and it may be granted to 26the person having the next highest rank as shown on the list   HB4631- 4 -LRB104 18387 LNS 31829 b1held by the Commission. If the person having the next highest 2rank, within 10 days after notification thereof by the 3Commission, fails to register at any such university in a 4special education program of teacher education, or who, having 5registered, withdraws from the university or transfers out of 6teacher education, the scholarship may then be granted to the 7person shown on the list as having the rank next below such 8person. 9    (d) Any person who has accepted a scholarship under the 10preceding subsections of this Section must, within one year 11after graduation from or termination of enrollment in a 12teacher education program, begin teaching at a nonprofit 13Illinois public, private, or parochial preschool or elementary 14or secondary school for a period of at least 2 of the 5 years 15immediately following that graduation or termination, 16excluding, however, from the computation of that 5 year period 17(i) any time up to 3 years spent in the military service, 18whether such service occurs before or after the person 19graduates; (ii) any time that person is enrolled full-time in 20an academic program related to the field of teaching leading 21to a graduate or postgraduate degree; (iii) the time that 22person is a person with a temporary total disability for a 23period of time not to exceed 3 years, as established by the 24sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; (iv) the time that 25person is seeking and unable to find full time employment as a 26teacher at an Illinois public, private, or parochial school;   HB4631- 5 -LRB104 18387 LNS 31829 b1(v) the time that person is taking additional courses, on at 2least a half-time basis, needed to obtain certification as a 3teacher in Illinois; or (vi) the time that person is 4fulfilling teaching requirements associated with other 5programs administered by the Commission if he or she cannot 6concurrently fulfill them under this Section in a period of 7time equal to the length of the teaching obligation. 8    A person who has accepted a scholarship under the 9preceding subsections of this Section and who has been unable 10to fulfill the teaching requirements of this Section may 11receive a deferment from the obligation of repayment under 12this subsection (d) under guidelines established by the 13Commission; provided that no guideline established for any 14such purpose by the State Board of Education prior to the 15effective date of this amendatory Act of 1993 shall be 16affected by the transfer to the Commission of the 17responsibility for administering and implementing the 18provisions of this Section, and all guidelines so established 19shall become the guidelines of the Commission until modified 20or changed by the Commission. 21    Any such person who fails to fulfill this teaching 22requirement shall pay to the Commission the amount of tuition 23waived by virtue of his or her acceptance of the scholarship, 24together with interest at 5% per year on that amount. However, 25this obligation to repay the amount of tuition waived plus 26interest does not apply when the failure to fulfill the   HB4631- 6 -LRB104 18387 LNS 31829 b1teaching requirement results from the death or adjudication as 2a person under legal disability of the person holding the 3scholarship, and no claim for repayment may be filed against 4the estate of such a decedent or person under legal 5disability. If a recipient who enters into repayment under 6this paragraph subsequently, within 5 years of entering 7repayment, begins to teach at a school meeting the description 8under this subsection (d), the Commission may reduce the 9amount owed by the recipient in proportion to the amount of the 10teaching obligation completed. Payments received by the 11Commission under this subsection (d) shall be remitted to the 12State Treasurer for deposit in the General Revenue Fund. Each 13person receiving a scholarship shall be provided with a 14description of the provisions of this subsection (d) at the 15time he or she qualifies for the benefits of such a 16scholarship. 17    (e) This Section is basically the same as Sections 30-1, 1830-2, 30-3, and 30-4a of the School Code, which are repealed by 19this amendatory Act of 1993, and shall be construed as a 20continuation of the teacher scholarship program established by 21that prior law, and not as a new or different teacher 22scholarship program. The State Board of Education shall 23transfer to the Commission, as the successor to the State 24Board of Education for all purposes of administering and 25implementing the provisions of this Section, all books, 26accounts, records, papers, documents, contracts, agreements,   HB4631- 7 -LRB104 18387 LNS 31829 b1and pending business in any way relating to the teacher 2scholarship program continued under this Section; and all 3scholarships at any time awarded under that program by, and 4all applications for any such scholarships at any time made 5to, the State Board of Education shall be unaffected by the 6transfer to the Commission of all responsibility for the 7administration and implementation of the teacher scholarship 8program continued under this Section. The State Board of 9Education shall furnish to the Commission such other 10information as the Commission may request to assist it in 11administering this Section. 12(Source: P.A. 103-448, eff. 8-4-23.)